Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3520
Criminal history record information; public record; criminal justice agencies; regulations; adopt.

Complete criminal history record information maintained by a criminal justice agency shall be a public record open to inspection and copying by any person during normal business hours and at such other times as may be established by the agency maintaining the record. Criminal justice agencies may adopt such regulations with regard to inspection and copying of records as are reasonably necessary for the physical protection of the records and the prevention of unnecessary interference with the discharge of the duties of the agency.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 22.